Hawaii statutes.
§669-3.5 Trial when legal title in
controversy. Whenever in an action brought under this chapter the legal
title is in controversy, the issue shall be triable of right by a jury. [L
1972, c 90, §12(d)]

Previous
Vol13_Ch0601-0676
Next